Utah statutes.
41-22-12.2.   Unlawful cross-country motor vehicle travel on public land.

(1)  A person may not operate and an owner of a motor vehicle may not give another person permission to operate a motor vehicle cross-country on any public land not designated for that use by the controlling agency.

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(3)  As part of any sentence for a conviction of a violation of this section, the court:

(a)  may impose a fine not to exceed $150; and

(b)  may require the person to perform community service in the form of repairing any damage to the public land caused by the unlawful cross-country motor vehicle travel.



Enacted by Chapter 289, 2009 General Session

